Utah statutes.
78B-6-137.   Decree of adoption -- Best interest of child -- Legislative findings.

The court shall examine each person appearing before it in accordance with this chapter, separately, and, if satisfied that the interests of the child will be promoted by the adoption, it shall enter a final decree of adoption declaring that the child is adopted by the adoptive parent or parents and shall be regarded and treated in all respects as the child of the adoptive parent or parents.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

